Utah statutes.
17C-4-104.   Board resolution approving a community development project area plan -- Requirements.

Each board resolution approving a draft community development project area plan as the project area plan under Subsection 17C-4-102(1)(f) shall contain:

(1)  a legal description of the boundaries of the project area that is the subject of the project area plan;

(2)  the agency's purposes and intent with respect to the project area;

(3)  the project area plan incorporated by reference; and

(4)  the board findings and determinations that adoption of the community development project area plan will:

(a)  satisfy a public purpose;

(b)  provide a public benefit as shown by the analysis described in Subsection 17C-4-103(11);

(c)  be economically sound and feasible;

(d)  conform to the community's general plan; and

(e)  promote the public peace, health, safety, and welfare of the community in which the project area is located.



Enacted by Chapter 359, 2006 General Session

